Utah statutes.
4-37-202.   Acquisition of aquatic animals for use in aquaculture facilities.

(1)  Live aquatic animals intended for use in aquaculture facilities may be purchased or acquired only from:

(a)  aquaculture facilities within the state that have a certificate of registration and health approval number;

(b)  public aquaculture facilities within the state that have a health approval number; or

(c)  sources outside the state that are health approved as provided in Part 5.

(2)  A person holding a certificate of registration for an aquaculture facility shall submit annually to the department a record of each purchase of live aquatic animals and transfer of live aquatic animals into the facility. This record shall include the following information:

(a)  name, address, and health approval number of the source;

(b)  date of transaction; and

(c)  number and weight by species.

(3)  The records required by Subsection (2) shall be submitted to the department before a certificate of registration is renewed or a subsequent certificate of registration is issued.

